New York, session 2025-2026, S3441.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Employees of the town of Ossining serving as uniformed court offi- 4 cers in the courts of the town of Ossining; provided, however, that 5 nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to authorize such employees 6 to carry, possess, repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate 7 license therefor has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal 8 law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07180-01-5